Illinois, session 104th, HB5567.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Warehouse Worker Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Adverse employment action" means an action that a 8reasonable worker would find materially adverse. 9    "Aggregated work speed data" means a compilation of work 10speed data for multiple workers, in summary form, assembled in 11full or in another form such that the data cannot be identified 12with any individual. 13    "Controlled group of corporations" has the meaning given 14to that term under Section 1563 of the Internal Revenue Code, 1526 U.S.C. 1563, except that "50 percent" shall be substituted 16for "80 percent" where "80 percent" is specified in that 17definition. 18    "Defined time period" means any unit of time measurement 19equal to or less than the duration of a worker's shift, 20including hours, minutes, seconds, and any fraction thereof. 21    "Department" means the Department of Labor.22    "Director" means the Director of Labor. 23    "Employer" means a person who directly or indirectly, or   HB5567- 2 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1through an agent or any other person, including through the 2services of a third-party employer, temporary services or 3staffing agency, independent contractor, or any similar 4entity, employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or 5working conditions of 250 or more workers at a single 6warehouse distribution center in the State or 1,000 or more 7workers at one or more warehouse distribution centers in the 8State. For the purposes of this definition, all workers of a 9controlled group of corporations shall be counted in 10determining the number of workers employed at a single 11warehouse distribution center or at one or more warehouse 12distribution centers in the State. 13    "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, 14limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited 15liability company, business trust, estate, trust, association, 16joint venture, agency, instrumentality, or any other legal or 17commercial entity, whether domestic or foreign. 18    "Quota" means a work performance standard under which: 19        (A) one or more workers are assigned or required to 20    perform at a specified productivity speed or a quantified 21    number of tasks or to handle or produce a quantified 22    amount of material without mistakes within a defined time 23    period and under which the worker may suffer an adverse 24    employment action if the worker fails to complete or meet 25    such work performance standard; 26        (B) actions by a worker are categorized and measured   HB5567- 3 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1    between time performing tasks and not performing tasks 2    within a defined time period; 3        (C) increments of time within a defined time period 4    during which a worker is or is not doing a particular 5    activity that are measured, recorded, or tallied; or 6        (D) a worker's performance is ranked in relation to 7    the performance of other workers. 8    "Warehouse distribution center" means an establishment as 9defined by any of the following North American Industry 10Classification System (NAICS) codes, however such 11establishment is denominated: 12        (1) 493 for Warehousing and Storage, but not including 13    493130 for Farm Product Warehousing and Storage; 14        (2) 423 for Merchant Wholesalers, Durable Goods; 15        (3) 424 for Merchant Wholesalers, Nondurable Goods, 16    but not including 424510 for Grain and Field Bean Merchant 17    Wholesalers, 424520 for Livestock Merchant Wholesalers, 18    and 424590 for Other Farm Product Raw Material 19    Wholesalers; 20        (4) 454110 for Electronic Shopping and Mail-Order 21    Houses; or22        (5) 492110 for Couriers and Express Delivery Services.23    "Worker" means a person performing a nonadministrative job 24who is not exempt from the overtime and minimum wage 25requirements of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, 26as amended, who works at a warehouse distribution center, and   HB5567- 4 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1who is subject to a quota as defined in this Section. "Worker" 2does not include a driver or courier to or from a warehouse 3distribution center. 4    "Work speed data" means information an employer collects, 5stores, analyzes, or interprets relating to an individual 6worker's performance of a quota, including, but not limited 7to, quantities of tasks performed, quantities of items or 8materials handled or produced, rates or speeds of tasks 9performed, measurements or metrics of worker performance in 10relation to a quota, and time categorized as performing tasks 11or not performing tasks. "Work speed data" does not include 12itemized wage statements or data that does not relate to the 13performance of a quota, except for any content of those 14records that includes work speed data.  15    Section 10. Disclosure of quotas. Each employer shall 16provide to each worker, upon hire or within 30 days after the 17effective date of this Act, whichever is later, a written 18description of each quota to which the worker is subject, 19including the quantified number of tasks to be performed or 20materials to be produced or handled within the defined time 21period, and any potential adverse employment action that could 22result from failure to meet the quota. Each time the quota 23changes thereafter, the employer shall provide an updated 24written description of each quota to which the worker is 25subject within 5 business days of the quota change. If an   HB5567- 5 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1employer takes an adverse employment action against a worker 2based on a quota, the worker has a right to request, and the 3employer shall provide, a written explanation regarding the 4manner in which the worker failed to perform, including the 5applicable quota and comparison of the work performance in 6relation to that quota. If a worker requests a written 7description of the quotas to which the worker was subject and a 8copy of the worker's own personal work speed data under this 9Section, the employer shall comply with this request as soon 10as practicable, but no later than 7 calendar days after the 11date of the request. 12    Section 15. Protection from quotas. A worker shall not be 13required to meet a quota that prevents compliance with meal or 14rest periods or use of bathroom facilities, including 15reasonable travel time to and from bathroom facilities. An 16employer shall not take adverse employment action against a 17worker for failure to meet a quota that does not allow a worker 18to comply with meal and rest periods or for failure to meet a 19quota that has not been disclosed to the worker under Section 2010. An employer shall not take adverse employment action 21against a worker for failure to meet a quota based on 22continuously measuring, recording, or tallying increments of 23time within a defined time period during which a covered 24worker is or is not doing a particular activity. An employer 25shall not take adverse employment action against a worker for   HB5567- 6 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1failure to meet a quota that measures a worker's total output 2over an increment of time that is shorter than such worker's 3workday. 4    Section 20. Time on task. Consistent with existing law, 5paid and unpaid breaks shall not be considered productive time 6for the purpose of any quota or monitoring system unless the 7worker is required to remain on call. 8    Section 25. Recordkeeping. Each employer shall establish, 9maintain, and preserve for 3 years contemporaneous, true, and 10accurate records to ensure compliance with worker and Director 11requests for records. An employer shall allow the Department 12access to such records, at reasonable times during business 13hours, to monitor compliance with the requirements of this 14Act. Nothing in this Section shall require an employer to keep 15such records if such employer does not use quotas or monitor 16work speed data as a performance standard that leads to an 17adverse employment action. 18    Section 30. Worker's right to request records. 19    (a) A current worker has the right to request a written 20description of each quota to which the worker is subject. If a 21current or former worker believes that the current or former 22worker has received an adverse employment action as a result 23of failing to meet a quota, or that meeting a quota caused a   HB5567- 7 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1violation of the worker's right to a meal or rest period or use 2of bathroom facilities, the current or former worker has the 3right to request, and the employer shall provide, a written 4description of each quota to which the worker is subject, a 5copy of the most recent 90 days of the worker's own personal 6work speed data, and a copy of the aggregated work speed data 7for similar workers at the same establishment for the same 8time period. 9    (b) Requested records under this Section shall be provided 10at no cost to the current or former worker. 11    (c) Nothing in this Section shall require an employer to 12use quotas or monitor work speed data. An employer that does 13not monitor this data has no obligation to provide it. 14    (d) The rights afforded under this Section are independent 15of any other right afforded to a worker or former worker under 16any State or federal law, including, but not limited to, the 17Personnel Record Review Act, to access documents maintained by 18an employer. 19    Section 35. Unlawful retaliation. For purposes of this 20Act, there shall be a rebuttable presumption of unlawful 21retaliation if an employer takes any adverse employment action 22against a worker within 90 days of the worker doing either of 23the following: 24        (1) initiating the worker's first request in a 25    calendar year for information about a quota or personal   HB5567- 8 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1    work speed data under Section 30 of this Act; or 2        (2) making a complaint related to a quota alleging any 3    violation of Section 10, 15, or 20 to the Director, the 4    Department, or the employer. 5    Section 40. Notice to workers. Every employer covered by 6this Act shall post and keep posted, in conspicuous places on 7the premises of the employer where notices to workers are 8customarily posted, a notice, to be prepared or approved by 9the Director of Labor, regarding workers' rights under this 10Act, including what constitutes a permissible quota and 11workers' rights to request quota and work speed data 12information, and making a complaint alleging a violation of a 13worker's quota rights under this Act. 14    Section 45. Enforcement. 15    (a) The Department has the power to administer and enforce 16this Act, and it is the duty of the Department to enforce the 17provisions of this Act when, in the Department's judgment, 18there is cause and sufficient resources for investigation. The 19Department has the powers and the parties have the rights 20provided in the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act for 21contested cases. 22    (b) The Department shall have the power to conduct 23investigations in connection with the administration and 24enforcement of this Act, including the power to conduct   HB5567- 9 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1depositions and discovery and to issue subpoenas. Any 2investigator with the Department shall be authorized to visit 3and inspect, at all reasonable times, any places covered by 4this Act and shall be authorized to inspect, at all reasonable 5times, and request copies of records required to be kept under 6Section 25. 7    (c) If the Department finds cause to believe that this Act 8has been violated, the Department shall notify the parties in 9writing, and the matter shall be referred to an Administrative 10Law Judge to schedule a formal hearing in accordance with the 11Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. Administrative 12decisions shall be reviewed under the Administrative Review 13Law. 14    (d) If an employer is found to have violated this Act, the 15employer may be liable for a civil penalty as follows: 16        (1) Up to $100 per pay period for every pay period in 17    which the worker worked before the employer disclosed the 18    quota, the change in quota, or the adverse employment 19    actions the worker may be subject to. 20        (2) Up to $100 for every instance in which an employer 21    fails to provide a worker written explanation of the 22    manner in which the worker failed to meet the quota as 23    required by Section 10. 24        (3) Up to $100 for every instance in which the 25    employer failed to provide the worker with that worker's 26    work speed data as required by Section 10.   HB5567- 10 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1        (4) Up to $100 for every instance in which the 2    employer subjected the worker to a quota that prevented 3    the worker from taking meal or rest periods or bathroom 4    breaks as prohibited by Section 15 or took an adverse 5    employment action against a worker for failing to meet 6    such a quota. 7        (5) Up to $100 for failing to keep or produce records 8    as required by Section 25. 9        (6) Up to $100 for every instance in which an employer 10    did not comply with a worker's request for work speed data 11    or other data or records provided for in Section 30. 12        (7) Up to $100 for unlawful retaliation as prohibited 13    by Section 35 and the worker is entitled to all legal and 14    equitable relief as may be appropriate. 15        (8) Up to $100 for failing to post the notice required 16    by Section 40. 17    (e) In addition to the civil penalties described in 18subsection (d), an employer shall be additionally liable to 19the Department for a civil penalty of $100 for each worker 20found to be affected by the violation of the Act. The civil 21penalty shall be deposited into the Wage Theft Enforcement 22Fund to be used for administration and enforcement of this 23Act. 24    (f) The Department is authorized to collect and supervise 25the payment of the civil penalty described in subsection (d) 26to a worker or workers under this Act. Any sums recovered by   HB5567- 11 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1the Department on behalf of a worker or workers under this Act 2shall be paid to the worker or workers affected. 3    Section 50. Workplace inspections. If a particular work 4site or employer that uses quotas as a performance standard to 5determine adverse employment actions and is subject to this 6Act is found to have an annual worker injury rate of at least 71.5 times as high as the warehousing industry's average annual 8injury rate as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics' 9most recent fatal and nonfatal occupational injuries and 10illnesses data, the Director shall determine whether an 11investigation of violations under this Act, if relevant to the 12Director's authority, is appropriate. 13    Section 55. Private right of action. A current or former 14worker may bring an action for injunctive relief to obtain 15compliance with Sections 10, 15, 20, and 30 and may, upon 16prevailing in the action, recover costs and reasonable 17attorney's fees in such action. In any action involving a 18quota that prevented the compliance with applicable 19regulations on workplace safety and health or meal or rest 20break requirements, the injunctive relief shall be limited to 21suspension of the quota and any adverse employment action that 22resulted from its enforcement by the employer. 23    Section 60. Attorney General; powers. The Attorney   HB5567- 12 -LRB104 18412 RPS 31854 b1General, pursuant to the authority under Section 6.3 of the 2Attorney General Act, may initiate or intervene in a civil 3action in the name of the People of the State in any circuit 4court to obtain all appropriate relief for violations 5established under this Act. 6    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 7severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 91, 2027.